test/src/morphology/N-kannwl28_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kannõĺ: # Noun (28) kannõĺ 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     kannõĺ+N+Sg+Nom: kannõĺ
     kannõĺ+N+Sg+Gen: kandlõ
     kannõĺ+N+Sg+Par: kannõld
     kannõĺ+N+Sg+Ill: kandlõhe
     kannõĺ+N+Pl+Gen: [kandlidõ, kannõldõ]
     kannõĺ+N+Pl+Par: kandlit
     kannõĺ+N+Pl+Ill: [kandlihe, kannõldõhe]
     kannõĺ+N+Pl+All: [kandlilõ, kannõldõlõ]
